Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-105
Kerosene; delivery; container or portable tank prohibited.

No person shall deliver kerosene, or what is known as coal oil, in any container or portable tank painted or stamped as provided by section 66-103.

Laws 1907, c. 86, § 2, p. 305;

R.S.1913, § 5755;

C.S.1922, § 5100;

C.S.1929, § 66-104;

R.S.1943, § 66-105;

Laws 1985, LB 441, § 4.